District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.33

Applicability of part.

(a)

This part shall apply to all new construction and substantial improvement projects located within the Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone, as defined in § 2-1226.04:

(1)

That are District-owned or District instrumentality-owned;

(2)

Where at least 15% of a project’s total cost is District-financed or District instrumentality-financed; or

(3)

That include a gift, lease, or sale from District-owned or District instrumentality-owned property to a private entity.

(b)

The requirements of § 2-1226.36 shall not apply to projects which, as of October 23, 2012, have:

(1)

Applied for a first building permit; or

(2)

Submitted a complete stormwater management plan to DDOE.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 453, 55 DCR 1689
Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-192, § 2(c), 59 DCR 10174
This section is referenced in § 2-1226.36.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-192 rewrote the section.